District of Columbia statutes.
20-713

Supervised administration; supplemental inventory; reappraisal.

(a)

Except as provided in section 20-731, the supervised personal representative shall report to the Court any property discovered after the filing of the original inventory by filing a supplemental inventory. For each item of after-discovered property, the supplemental inventory shall satisfy the requirements of section 20-711(a) and shall be certified in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

A supervised personal representative shall have any item reappraised upon discovering that the original appraisal was erroneous or misleading. The supervised personal representative shall file the reappraisal and certification required by subsection (c) with the Court.

(c)

A supplemental inventory or reappraisal filed with the Court shall be accompanied by a certification by the supervised personal representative that there has been mailed or delivered to all interested persons within the previous 15 days a copy of the supplemental inventory or reappraisal.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(jj), 42 DCR 63
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 19(e), 44 DCR 1271
This section is referenced in § 20-731 and § 20-733.
1981 Ed., § 20-713.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.